Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1916
Private foundations; requirements.

Except when otherwise determined by a court of competent jurisdiction, a corporation that is a private foundation as defined in section 509(a) of the Internal Revenue Code:

(a) Shall distribute such amounts for each taxable year at such time and in such manner as not to subject the corporation to tax under section 4942 of the Internal Revenue Code;

(b) Shall not engage in any act of self-dealing as defined in section 4941(d) of the Internal Revenue Code;

(c) Shall not retain any excess business holdings as defined in section 4943(c) of the Internal Revenue Code;

(d) Shall not make any investments subjecting it to taxation under section 4944 of the Internal Revenue Code; and

(e) Shall not make any taxable expenditures as defined in section 4945(d) of the Internal Revenue Code.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 16;

Laws 1998, LB 1015, § 1.